Vermont, session 2025-2026, H565.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 4461 is amended to read:
§ 4461. SECURITY DEPOSITS
(a)(1) A security deposit is any advance, deposit, or prepaid rent, however
named, which is refundable to the tenant at the termination or expiration of the
tenancy, including any interest accrued in accordance with this subsection.
The function of a security deposit is to secure the performance of a tenant’s
obligations to pay rent and to maintain a dwelling unit.
VT LEG #385909 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.565
2026 Page 2 of 4
(2) A landlord shall not charge for or receive a security deposit
exceeding an amount equal to three month’s rent.
(3) A landlord shall maintain a security deposit in an interest-bearing
account on behalf of the tenant. Interest accrued in the account shall not count
towards the limit imposed by subdivision (2) of this subsection.
* * *
(g) A town or municipality may adopt an ordinance governing security
deposits on dwellings. The ordinance shall be supplemental to and not
inconsistent with the minimum protections of the provisions of this section.
The ordinance may not limit how a security deposit is held. The ordinance
may authorize the payment of interest on a security deposit. The ordinance
may provide that a housing board of review constituted pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
§ 5005 may hear and decide disputes related to security deposits upon request
for a hearing by a landlord or tenant. The board’s actions shall be reviewable
under 24 V.S.A. § 5006.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6244 is amended to read:
§ 6244. SECURITY DEPOSITS
(a)(1) A security deposit is any advance, deposit, or prepaid rent that is
refundable to a leaseholder at the termination or expiration of the occupancy,
including any interest accrued in accordance with this subsection. A security
VT LEG #385909 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.565
2026 Page 3 of 4
deposit is to secure the leaseholder’s obligation to pay rent and to maintain a
rented mobile home or mobile home lot.
(2) A mobile home park owner shall not charge for or receive a security
deposit exceeding an amount equal to three month’s lot rent.
(3) A park owner shall maintain a security deposit in an interest-bearing
account on behalf of the leaseholder. Interest accrued in the account shall not
count towards the limit imposed by subdivision (2) of this subsection.
* * *
(g) A municipality may adopt an ordinance governing security deposits on
mobile homes or mobile home lots. The ordinance shall be supplemental to
and not inconsistent with the minimum protections of the provisions of this
section. The ordinance may not limit how a security deposit is held. The
ordinance may authorize the payment of interest on a security deposit. The
ordinance may provide that a housing board of review constituted pursuant to
24 V.S.A. § 5005 may hear and decide disputes related to security deposits
upon request for a hearing by a park owner or leaseholder. The board’s actions
shall be reviewable under 24 V.S.A. § 5006.
Sec. 3. SECURITY DEPOSIT; TRANSITION PERIOD
(a) Notwithstanding 9 V.S.A. § 4461(a) or 10 V.S.A. § 6244(a), a landlord
or mobile home park owner may retain a security deposit that exceeds an
amount equal to three month’s rent or three month’s lot rent, provided that the
VT LEG #385909 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.565
2026 Page 4 of 4
residential rental agreement or mobile home lot lease was in effect prior to July
1, 2026.
(b) A landlord or mobile home park owner shall deposit any security
deposit collected prior to July 1, 2026, into an interest-bearing account within
30 days following July 1, 2026.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385909 v.1